Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 10. POLITICAL PARTIES

SUBTITLE C. PARTIES NOMINATING BY CONVENTION

CHAPTER 181. PARTY WITH STATE ORGANIZATION

SUBCHAPTER A. NOMINATING BY CONVENTION GENERALLY

Sec. 181.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies to a political party making nominations by convention except a party making nominations only for county and precinct offices under Chapter 182.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 181.002. NOMINATING BY CONVENTION AUTHORIZED. A political party may make nominations for the general election for state and county officers by convention, as provided by this chapter, if the party is authorized by Section 172.002 to make nominations by primary election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 181.003. NOMINATING BY CONVENTION REQUIRED. A political party must make nominations for the general election for state and county officers by convention, as provided by this chapter, if the party is not required or authorized to nominate by primary election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 181.004. PARTY ORGANIZATION. (a) A political party making nominations under this chapter shall:

(1) establish a state executive committee;

(2) establish a county executive committee for each county in which the party will hold a county convention; and

(3) select a precinct chair for each election precinct in which the party will hold a precinct convention.

(b) The party shall provide by rule for the selection of a chair of the state executive committee and each county executive committee.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 188, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 181.0041. REGISTRATION OF PARTY REQUIRED. A political party that intends to make nominations under this chapter for the general election for state and county officers must register with the secretary of state, in the manner prescribed by the secretary, not later than January 2 of the election year.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 70, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 181.005. QUALIFYING FOR PLACEMENT ON BALLOT BY PARTY REQUIRED TO NOMINATE BY CONVENTION. (a) To be entitled to have the names of its nominees placed on the general election ballot, a political party required to make nominations by convention must file with the secretary of state, not later than the 75th day after the date of the precinct conventions held under this chapter, lists of precinct convention participants indicating that the number of participants equals at least one percent of the total number of votes received by all candidates for governor in the most recent gubernatorial general election. The lists must include each participant's residence address and voter registration number.

(b) A political party is entitled to have the names of its nominees placed on the ballot, without qualifying under Subsection (a), in each subsequent general election following a general election in which the party had a nominee for a statewide office who received a number of votes equal to at least five percent of the total number of votes received by all candidates for that office.

(c) A political party is entitled to have the names of its nominees placed on the general election ballot, without qualifying under Subsection (a) or (b), if the party had a nominee for a statewide office who received a number of votes equal to at least two percent of the total number of votes received by all candidates for that office at least once in the five previous general elections.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 48, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 822 (H.B. 2504), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 181.006. PETITION SUPPLEMENTING PRECINCT CONVENTION LISTS. (a) If the number of precinct convention participants indicated on the lists filed under Section 181.005 is fewer than the number required for the political party to qualify to have the names of its nominees placed on the ballot, the party may qualify by filing a petition as provided by this section.

(b) A petition must:

(1) satisfy the requirements prescribed by Section 141.062 for a candidate's petition;

(2) contain signatures in a number that, when added to the number of convention participants indicated on the lists, equals at least one percent of the total number of votes received by all candidates for governor in the most recent gubernatorial general election; and

(3) be filed with the secretary of state by the state chair before the deadline for filing the lists of precinct convention participants.

(c) Except as provided by this section, the petition is subject to the applicable provisions of Subchapter C, Chapter 141.

(d) A signer's voter registration is not required to be in any particular territory.

(e) A copy of a request for the withdrawal of a signature must be delivered to the state chair at the time the withdrawal request is filed.

(f) The following statement must appear at the top of each page of the petition: "I know that the purpose of this petition is to entitle the _______ Party to have its nominees placed on the ballot in the general election for state and county officers. I have not voted in a primary election or participated in a convention of another party during this voting year, and I understand that I become ineligible to do so by signing this petition. I understand that signing more than one petition to entitle a party to have its nominees placed on the general election ballot in the same election is prohibited."

(g) A person who has voted in a primary election or participated in a convention of another party during the voting year in which the petition is circulated is ineligible to sign the petition, and the signature of such a person is invalid.

(h) A signature is invalid if the person signed the petition subsequent to signing a petition to qualify another political party to have the names of its nominees placed on the ballot for the same election, whether the other party is circulating the petition under this chapter or under Chapter 182.

(i) On signing the petition, the person becomes ineligible to affiliate with another party during the voting year in which the petition is signed.

(j) The petition may not be circulated until after the date of the party's precinct conventions held under this chapter. A signature obtained on or before that date is invalid.

(k) The secretary of state shall post a notice of the receipt of a petition on the secretary of state's Internet website and may post the notice on a bulletin board used for posting notice of meetings of state governmental bodies. Any person may challenge the validity of the petition by filing a written statement of the challenge with the secretary of state not later than the fifth day after the date notice is posted. The secretary of state may verify the petition signatures regardless of whether the petition is timely challenged.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 189, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 64, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1052 (H.B. 933), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 181.007. NOTICE OF QUALIFYING PARTIES. (a) The secretary of state shall deliver to the authority responsible for having the official general election ballot prepared in each county written notice of the name of each party required to nominate by convention that qualifies to have the names of its nominees placed on the general election ballot.

(b) The notice shall be delivered at the same time as the secretary of state's certification of nominees for statewide and district offices for placement on the general election ballot.

(c) The names of the nominees of a party required to nominate by convention may not be placed on the ballot without the notice.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

SUBCHAPTER B. APPLICATION FOR NOMINATION

Sec. 181.031. APPLICATION REQUIRED. (a) To be entitled to be considered for nomination by a convention held under this chapter, a person must make an application for nomination.

(b) An application must comply with the requirements prescribed by Section 141.031 for an application for a place on the ballot, with changes appropriate to indicate that the application is for nomination by a convention instead of for a place on the ballot.

(c) This section does not apply to a nomination for an unexpired term if the vacancy occurs after the 10th day before the date of the regular deadline for filing an application for convention nomination.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 181.0311. FILING FEE OR PETITION REQUIRED. (a) In addition to any other requirements, to be considered for nomination by convention, a candidate must:

(1) pay a filing fee to the secretary of state for a statewide or district office or the county judge for a county or precinct office; or

(2) submit to the secretary of state for a statewide or district office or the county judge for a county or precinct office a petition in lieu of a filing fee that satisfies the requirements prescribed by Subsection (e) and Section 141.062.

(b) The amount of the filing fee is the amount prescribed by Section 172.024 for a candidate for nomination for the same office in a general primary election.

(c) A filing fee received by the secretary of state shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the general revenue fund.

(d) A filing fee received by the county judge shall be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of the county general fund.

(e) The minimum number of signatures that must appear on the petition authorized by Subsection (a) is the number prescribed by Section 172.025 to appear on a petition of a candidate for nomination for the same office in a general primary election.

(f) The secretary of state shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 822 (H.B. 2504), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Election Code, Section 141.041 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 149 (S.B. 2093), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 181.032. AUTHORITY WITH WHOM APPLICATION FILED. (a) An application for nomination by a convention must be filed with:

(1) the state chair, for a statewide or district office; or

(2) the county chair, for a county or precinct office.

(b) Not later than the 10th day after the date of the filing deadline prescribed by Section 181.033, the authority with whom an application is filed shall deliver to the secretary of state a list containing:

(1) each candidate's name;

(2) each candidate's residence address;

(3) the office sought by the candidate;

(4) the date on which the candidate filed the application; and

(5) any additional information required by the secretary of state.

(c) A list delivered under Subsection (b) must be in a format prescribed by the secretary of state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 190, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 360 (H.B. 1265), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1130 (H.B. 2628), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 181.033. FILING DEADLINE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), an application for nomination by a convention must be filed not later than the regular deadline for candidates to file applications for a place on the general primary ballot.

(b) A political party by rule may extend the filing deadline for applications for nomination for an office for which a candidate who has made an application withdraws, dies, or is declared ineligible.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1055 (H.B. 3103), Sec. 11, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 181.034. DISPOSITION OF APPLICATIONS. (a) A political party shall provide by rule for transmitting information regarding applications for nomination to the chair of the appropriate convention.

(b) If an application is delivered to a convention, it shall be returned to the authority with whom it was filed not later than the 10th day after the date of the convention.

(c) The authority with whom an application is filed shall preserve each application for two years after the date of the appropriate convention.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 191, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER C. CONVENTIONS

Sec. 181.061. CONVENTIONS AT WHICH NOMINATIONS MADE. (a) A political party nominating by convention must make its nominations for statewide offices at a state convention held on the second Saturday in April of the election year, except that if the Sunday after the second Saturday in April in an election year is the date of the Easter holiday, the state convention must be held on the third Saturday in April of that year. The state convention consists of delegates selected at the county conventions held under Subsection (c).

(b) A party nominating by convention must make its nominations for offices of districts situated in more than one county at district conventions held on the second Saturday after the second Tuesday in March. A district convention consists of delegates selected at the county conventions held under Subsection (c).

(c) A party nominating by convention must make its nominations for county and precinct offices and for offices of districts not situated in more than one county at county conventions held on the first Saturday after the second Tuesday in March. A county convention consists of delegates selected at precinct conventions held on the second Tuesday in March in the regular county election precincts.

(d) A party by rule may limit the delegates making nominations to those from the territory from which the office sought is elected.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 576 (S.B. 817), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 181.062. NUMBER OF DELEGATES SELECTED. A political party shall provide by rule for the number of delegates to be selected at the precinct conventions for the county conventions and the number of delegates to be selected at the county conventions for the district conventions and the state convention held under this chapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 181.063. HOUR AND PLACE OF PRECINCT AND COUNTY CONVENTIONS. The hours and places for convening the county convention and precinct conventions held under this chapter shall be set as provided by Section 174.022 for setting the hours and places of precinct conventions of a party holding a primary election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1054 (H.B. 3102), Sec. 29, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 181.064. NOTICE OF HOUR AND PLACE. Notice of the hour and place for convening the county convention and precinct conventions held under this chapter shall be posted and delivered as provided by Section 174.023 for posting and delivering notice of the hour and place for convening precinct conventions for a party holding a primary election, except that notice of a county convention shall:

(1) be posted for the 10 days immediately preceding the date of the county convention; and

(2) be delivered to the county clerk not later than the 10th day before the date of the county convention.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 181.065. PARTICIPANT TO BE REGISTERED VOTER. To be eligible to participate in a precinct convention held under this chapter, a person must be a registered voter of the precinct or a precinct resident who is eligible to vote a limited ballot.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 181.066. ORGANIZING PRECINCT CONVENTION. (a) Unless the state executive committee has adopted rules providing that the precinct chair is the permanent chair, the precinct chair is the temporary chair of a precinct convention held under this chapter. If the precinct chair is absent or declines the position, a participant may act as a temporary chair.

(b) Before conducting business, the precinct chair or temporary chair shall prepare a list containing the name and residence address of each person who is admitted to participate in the convention. In preparing the list, the chair shall use information from preregistration if the party has adopted a preregistration process under Section 162.017.

(c) The precinct chair or temporary chair shall call the convention to order.

(d) The convention shall select a convention chair if a temporary chair is acting as chair. The convention may select any other officers considered necessary to conduct the convention's business.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 192, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1054 (H.B. 3102), Sec. 30, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 181.067. DELIVERY OF LIST OF PRECINCT CONVENTION PARTICIPANTS. (a) The chair of a precinct convention shall sign and make a copy of the list of precinct convention participants required by Section 181.066(b).

(b) The convention chair shall deliver the original and copy to the county chair not later than the third day after the date of the precinct convention, except that if delivered by mail they shall be deposited in the mail not later than the second day after the date of the precinct convention.

(c) If the party is required to nominate by convention, the convention chair shall make an additional copy of the list and deliver it to the state chair not later than the third day after the date of the precinct convention.

(d) An electronic submission to the county chair through a system created by party rule constitutes a complete delivery under Subsection (b).

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 193, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1054 (H.B. 3102), Sec. 31, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 181.068. PARTY'S CERTIFICATION OF NOMINEES. (a) The presiding officer of each convention held under this chapter shall certify, in a format prescribed by the secretary of state, for placement on the general election ballot the name and address of each candidate nominated by the convention.

(b) Not later than the 20th day after the date of the convention making the nomination, the presiding officer shall deliver the certification to:

(1) the authority responsible for having the official general election ballot prepared in the county, for certification of a county or precinct office; or

(2) the secretary of state, for certification of a statewide or district office.

(c) A presiding officer may not certify a candidate's name if, before delivering the certification, the presiding officer learns that the name is to be omitted from the ballot under Section 145.035.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1130 (H.B. 2628), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.